District of Columbia statutes.
46-218

Voluntary income withholding.

(a)

An obligor may obtain voluntary income withholding by filing with the IV-D agency a request for withholding and, if the support order is from another jurisdiction, a certified copy of the support order.

(b)

Upon receipt of a request under subsection (a) of this section, the IV-D agency shall serve an order to withhold on the holder specified in the obligor’s request. Payments shall be made through the Collection and Disbursement Unit.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 19, 33 DCR 6710
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 108(r), 48 DCR 1270
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3403(n), 51 DCR 8441
May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-100, § 3(r), 53 DCR 1886
1981 Ed., § 30-518.
D.C. Law 13-269 substituted “Collection and Disbursement Unit” for “Court” throughout.
D.C. Law 15-205, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “Court” for “Collection and Disbursement Unit”.
D.C. Law 16-100 rewrote the section, which had read:
“(a) Any person who is the obligor on a support order of this jurisdiction or another jurisdiction may obtain voluntary income withholding by filing with the Court a request for withholding and a certified copy of the support order if the order is from another jurisdiction.
“(b) Upon receipt of a request under subsection (a) of this section and appropriate documentation, the Court shall issue a notice to the holder pursuant to § 46-211. Payment shall be made through the Court.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(r) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(r) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
Section 3(s) of D.C. Law 16-42 rewrote section to read as follows:
“Sec. 19. Voluntary income withholding.
“(a) An obligor may obtain voluntary income withholding by filing with the IV-D agency a request for withholding and, if the support order is from another jurisdiction, a certified copy of the support order.
“(b) Upon receipt of a request under subsection (a) of this section, the IV-D agency shall serve an order to withhold on the holder specified in the obligor’s request. Payments shall be made through the Collection and Disbursement Unit.”
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 16-42 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 7(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 7(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 7(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 7(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 107(q) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 108(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(u) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-167, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7648).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(u) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-200, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10490).